Oklahoma, session 2026, SB126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of


Transportation from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the


General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2023, the sum of Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00)


or so much thereof as may be necessary to improve access to


industrial areas experiencing major developments.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-486 MSBB 12/27/2024 11:37:54 AM



Req. No. 486 Page 1